California statutes. Vehicle Code
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, any county may by ordinance prohibit the use of any street, road or highway by any commercial vehicle exceeding a maximum gross weight of 14,000 pounds if, by accepted engineering standards, the street, road or highway cannot support such vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1732.)
-------------------------------------------

35718.

No ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 35717 shall be effective until appropriate signs are erected indicating either the streets, roads or highways affected by the ordinance or the streets, roads or highways not affected, as the board of supervisors may determine will best serve to give notice of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1732.)
-------------------------------------------

35719.

No ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 35717 shall be effective with respect to any street, road or highway which connects with, or is a continuation of, any street, road or highway of an adjoining county unless the board of supervisors of each county in which the street, road or highway is a through highway, by concurrent action and like limitation, prohibit the use of such street, road or highway pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1732.)
-------------------------------------------

35720.

No ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 35717 shall be effective with respect to:

(a) Any vehicle which is subject to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1031) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code or any farm labor vehicle.

(b) Any street, road or highway which is not under the exclusive jurisdiction of the board of supervisors enacting such ordinance, except as otherwise provided in Section 35719, or, in the case of any state highway, until such proposed ordinance has been
 submitted by the board of supervisors to and approved in writing by the Department of Transportation. In submitting such a proposed ordinance to the department for approval, the board of supervisors shall designate therein, an alternate route or routes for the use of such vehicles which shall remain unrestricted by any local regulation as to weight limits or types of vehicles so long as the ordinance proposed shall remain in effect. The approval of such proposed ordinances by the Department of Transportation shall constitute an approval by the department of such alternate route or routes so designated.

(c) Any commercial vehicle coming from an unrestricted street, road or highway having ingress and egress by direct route to and from such restricted streets, roads, and highways when necessary for the purpose of making pickups or deliveries of goods, wares and merchandise from or to any building or structure located on such restricted streets,
 roads or highways or for the purpose of delivering materials to be used in the actual and bona fide repair, alteration, remodeling or construction of any building or structure upon such restricted street, road or highway for which a building permit, if required, has previously been obtained therefor, or vehicles, machinery, or construction equipment used in connection with, the construction, repair or maintenance of such restricted street or public work projects located thereon.

(d) Any vehicle operated as an incident to any industrial, commercial, or agricultural enterprise conducted upon any such street, road, or highway.

(e) Any vehicle owned, operated, controlled, or used by a public utility or licensed contractor in connection with the construction, installation, operation, maintenance, or repair of any public utility facilities or public works projects.

(f) The operation of ambulances or hearses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 317.)
-------------------------------------------

35721.

No ordinance shall be adopted pursuant to Section 35717 except upon notice and hearing in the manner prescribed in this section.

Notice of hearing shall be published as prescribed in Section 6064 of the Government Code. The notice shall advise all interested parties that they may submit written or oral objections to the proposed action and shall designate a time and place for presentation of such objections. The time for submission of objections shall not expire, and the hearing may not be held, less than 60 days after the first publication of notice. The hearing shall be held before the board of supervisors and interested parties
 shall be afforded an adequate opportunity to be heard with respect to their objections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1732.)
-------------------------------------------

35722.

Prior to the execution of freeway agreements for State Highway Route 85 in Santa Clara County, with the concurrence of each city within the highway corridor, the Board of Supervisors of the County of Santa Clara may, after a public hearing, adopt a proposed ordinance imposing a maximum gross truck weight limit of 9,000 pounds on Route 85 from State Highway Route 280 in Cupertino south and east to State Highway Route 101 in San Jose, and submit the proposed ordinance to the Department of Transportation for approval.

Upon approval of the proposed ordinance by the department, this weight limit shall be stipulated in
 the applicable freeway agreements with the local entities in the Route 85 corridor.

If the proposed ordinance is approved by the department, the weight limit shall become effective upon opening of any portion of the new Route 85 freeway corridor as defined in this section, and the department shall post appropriate signs, similar to the signs on State Highway Route 580 in Oakland. Except as otherwise provided in this section, this article shall be applicable to an ordinance adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1250, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bridges and Other Structures [35750. - 35755.]

35750.

(a) The Department of Transportation may, in the manner provided in Section 35751, determine the maximum weight of vehicle and load, lower than the maximum weight otherwise permitted under this code which a bridge or other structure with safety to itself will sustain.

(b) The city council or the board of supervisors of a city or county with a population of 1,100,000 or more, as determined by the 1970 federal decennial census, may, in the manner provided in Section 35751, determine the maximum weight of vehicle and load, lower than the maximum weight otherwise permitted under this code
 which a bridge or other structure under its jurisdiction with safety to itself will sustain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35751.

(a) The Department of Transportation or the city council or board of supervisors of a city or county with a population of 1,100,000 or more, as determined by the 1970 federal decennial census, as the case may be, shall make an engineering investigation and hold a public hearing whenever such a determination appears necessary.

(b) Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be posted upon the bridge or other structure at least five days before the date fixed for the hearing. Upon the basis of the investigation and all evidence presented at the hearing, the department or the city
 council or board of supervisors, as the case may be, shall determine by order in writing the maximum weight of vehicle and load which the bridge or other structure with safety to itself will sustain.

(c) With respect to any bridge or other structure not under its jurisdiction, the department shall not proceed under subdivisions (a) and (b) unless it first receives a request to do so from the city council or the board of supervisors having jurisdiction over the bridge or other structure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35752.

Thereupon, the authority having jurisdiction over the bridge or other structure shall erect and maintain suitable signs specifying the maximum weight so determined, at a distance of not more than 500 feet from each end of the bridge or other structure or any approach thereto.

The standards and specifications for such signs shall be established in accordance with Section 21400 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1033.)
-------------------------------------------

35753.

(a) No person shall drive a vehicle over any bridge, causeway, viaduct, trestle, or dam constituting a part of a highway when the weight of the vehicle and load thereon is greater than the maximum weight which the bridge or other structure with safety to itself will sustain. Violations of this subdivision shall be punished in accordance with the schedule of fines set forth in Section 42030.

(b) Upon the trial of any person charged with a violation with respect to a weight restriction sign erected pursuant to Section 35752, proof of the determination of the maximum
 weight by the Department of Transportation and the existence of the weight restriction signs constitute prima facie evidence of the maximum weight which the bridge or other structure with safety to itself will sustain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 542, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

35754.

Whenever, in the opinion of a local authority, a bridge under its jurisdiction is in a dangerous or weak condition, it may temporarily erect suitable signs at all entrances to such bridge specifying the maximum weight which it believes the bridge with safety to itself will sustain. The maximum weight limit so fixed and posted shall remain in effect for not more than 90 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 597.)
-------------------------------------------

35755.

Whenever a state highway bridge is in a dangerous or weak condition, the Department of Transportation may temporarily erect suitable signs at all entrances to such bridge specifying the maximum weight which the bridge may safely sustain. Under no circumstances shall the maximum weight limit so fixed and posted pursuant to this section remain in effect for more than 90 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Permits and Agreements [35780. - 35796.]

35780.

(a) The Department of Transportation or local authorities, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions, may, at their discretion upon application and if good cause appears, issue a special permit authorizing the applicant:

(1) To operate or move a vehicle or combination of vehicles or special mobile equipment of a size or weight of vehicle or load exceeding the maximum specified in this code. 

(2) To use corrugations on the periphery of the movable tracks on a traction engine or tractor, the propulsive power of which is not exerted through wheels resting upon the roadway but by means of a flexible band or chain.

(3) Under emergency conditions, to operate or move a type of vehicle otherwise prohibited hereunder, upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the party granting the permit and for the maintenance of which the party is responsible.

(4) To operate or move a vehicle or combination of vehicles transporting loads composed of logs only for the purpose of crossing a highway from one private property to another without complying with any or all of the equipment requirements of Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000) and Division 13 (commencing with Section 29000). These crossings shall be as near to a right angle to the roadway as is practical and
 shall not include any travel parallel to the roadway. The Department of Transportation shall determine standards and conditions upon which permits shall be issued and any permit not in compliance with those standards and conditions shall be invalid, except that a permit may contain more restrictive conditions if the issuing authority deems it appropriate.

(b) Under conditions prescribed by the Department of Transportation or the local authority, the Department of Transportation or local authority may accept applications made by, and issue permits directly to, an applicant or permit service by any of the following processes:

(1) In writing.

(2) By an authorized facsimile process.

(3) Through an authorized computer and modem connection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 391, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

35780.3.

A permit issued under Section 35780 for the movement of a park trailer, as described in Section 18009.3 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not be issued except to transporters, or licensed manufacturers and dealers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 566, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35780.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 320.5, the Department of Transportation or a local authority, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions, may, upon application, issue a special permit authorizing the applicant to operate or move a vehicle carrying a load, lying in the horizontal position, of stacked trusses or wall panels that are used as single width components in the manufacture of a finished product, that exceeds the maximum width specified by this code, if the load does not exceed 12 feet in width and the permittee
 complies with the regulations of the Department of Transportation or a local authority, as the case may be, governing the transportation of these loads.

(b) Under conditions prescribed by the Department of Transportation or the local authority, the Department of Transportation or local authority may accept applications and issue permits directly to an applicant or permit service, by any of the following processes:

(1) In writing.

(2) By an authorized facsimile process.

(3) Through an authorized computer and modem connection.

(c) The special permit allowed pursuant to this section shall, under conditions prescribed by the Department of Transportation or a local authority, be granted on
 either a per trip or annual basis.

(d) As used in this section, “truss” means a designed and manufactured assemblage of structural elements typically arranged in a triangle or combination of triangles to form a rigid framework and used as a structural support in buildings.

(e) As used in this section, “wall panel” means a designed and manufactured assemblage of structural elements constructed in the same manner as site-built walls to form a rigid framework and used as a structural support in buildings, which may have attached various types of sheathing products including wood structural panels, foam panels, and gypsum board that do not exceed more than one foot beyond the main structural elements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 514, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

35781.

The Department of Transportation shall develop a standard application form and a standard permit form for the application for, and the issuance of, a permit. The standard permit form may be used as the standard application form. The application for a permit shall specifically describe the vehicle and load to be operated or moved and the particular highways over which permit to operate is requested, and whether the permit is requested for a single trip or for continuous operation. Local authorities shall use the standard application form and the standard permit
 form developed by the Department of Transportation. The standard application form and the standard permit form shall be developed in cooperation with representatives of local government and the commercial trucking industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 464, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

35782.

(a) The Department of Transportation or a local authority may issue or withhold the permit at its discretion, or, if the permit is issued, do any of the following when necessary to protect against injury to the road, foundations, surfaces, or structures:

(1) Limit the number of trips.

(2) Establish seasonal or other time limitations within which the vehicle or vehicles described may be operated on the highways
 indicated.

(3) Otherwise limit or prescribe conditions of operation of the vehicle.

(b) The Department of Transportation or a local authority may not require the posting of a bond as a condition of the issuance of a permit, except that a requirement of extra insurance or other financial security may be imposed as a condition for a permit for unusually large or heavy loads that pose a substantial risk to public facilities.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Department of Transportation or a local authority may not require proof of financial responsibility in an amount greater than that required for compliance with Section 16500.5 as a condition of the permit, and shall accept evidence of financial responsibility that complies with Section 16020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 137.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

35783.

Every permit shall be carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles to which it refers and shall be open to inspection of any peace officer, traffic officer, authorized agent of the Department of Transportation, or any other officer or employee charged with the care or protection of such highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35783.5.

Warning signs required by the terms of a permit shall either be removed from the vehicle or covered from the view of other motorists whenever the vehicle is operating without the load that required the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 287.)
-------------------------------------------

35784.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), it is unlawful for any person to violate any of the terms or conditions of any special permit.

(b) In an incorporated city where compliance with the route described in a special permit would result in a violation of local traffic regulations, the permittee may detour from the prescribed route to avoid violating the local traffic regulations if the permittee returns as soon as possible to the prescribed route. A detour under this subdivision shall be made only on nonresidential streets. 

(c) If a violation under subdivision (a) consists of an extralegal load not being on the route described in the special permit, and the violation is directly caused by the action of an employee under the supervision of, or by the action of any independent contractor working for, a permittee subject to this section, the employee or independent contractor causing the violation is guilty of a misdemeanor. This subdivision applies only if the employee or independent contractor has been provided written direction on the route to travel and has not been directed to take a different route by a peace officer.

(d) The guilt of an employee or independent contractor under subdivision (c) shall not extend to the permittee employing that person unless the permittee is separately responsible for an action causing the violation.

(e) A
 violation of equipment requirements contained in Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000), by any person operating a pilot car shall not be considered a violation of any terms or conditions of a special permit under subdivision (a).

(f) (1) Any person convicted of a violation of the terms and conditions of a special permit shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) In addition, if the violation involves weight in excess of that authorized by the permit, an additional fine shall be levied as specified in Section 42030 on the amount of weight in excess of the amount authorized by the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 460, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

35784.5.

(a) Any person convicted of transporting an extralegal load on a highway, or causing or directing the operation of or driving on a highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles for which a permit is required pursuant to this article, without having obtained a permit issued in accordance with this article, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) If the violation involves excess weight, an additional fine shall be levied
 as specified in Section 42030 on the amount of weight in excess of that authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 542, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

35785.

(a) The axle weight limitations imposed in Sections 35550 and 35551 shall not apply to the transportation of a single saw log which does not exceed 8 feet in diameter and 21 feet in length or 6 feet in diameter and 33 feet in length, if such log is hauled on a combination of vehicles consisting of a three-axle truck and a two-axle logging dolly under permit issued by the Department of Transportation or by local authorities with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions. Such permit may be granted for not more than thirty (30) days and may be revocable upon notice by the department or local authorities, as the case may be. (b) When so transported, the vehicle shall not be operated over any bridge or causeway at a speed of more than 15 miles per hour or on the highway at more than 25 miles per hour, on routes designated in the permit. Diameter measurements of the logs shall be made on the large end.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35786.

Truck booster power units may be used to aid in propelling or moving any motor truck or lawful combination of motor vehicles upon a highway upon an ascending or descending grade, subject to the following conditions:

(a) A permit for such operation must be obtained as provided in this article. 

(b) The truck booster power unit shall be operated only on such highways and at such times and according to such conditions and requirements as may be specified in the permit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35787.

The Department of Transportation or local authority, as the case may be, shall issue a truck booster power unit permit only if in its opinion the proposed operation would not tend to endanger the traveling public or to damage the highway, bridge or any highway structure.

The Department of Transportation and local authorities, in issuing a permit, may make such conditions and requirements as in their opinion are necessary or desirable for the safety of the traveling public and of the highway, including bridges and other highway structures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35788.

Upon application to the Director of Transportation for permission to use and operate on highways private or contract vehicles for the purpose of hauling loads which weigh in excess of the maximum load weight limits, the director may enter into an agreement with the applicant, permitting such overloads, specifying protective restrictions and providing for the payment of a financial contribution for the issuance of such permission, except that the overload shall not exceed 25 percent of the maximum load weight limitation, in pounds, set forth in this code. The agreement shall not permit the applicant to transport such excess
 weight loads on highways for distances exceeding 75 miles. All contributions received by the Department of Transportation shall be used for the construction, improvement, or maintenance of the highway designated in the permission to operate overweight loads. Sections 188 and 188.8 of the Streets and Highways Code does not apply to contributions received pursuant to this section, and any expenditures of the contributions by the department shall not be credited against amounts required to be expended pursuant to Sections 188 and 188.8 of the Streets and Highways Code.

This section does not apply to highways which are a part of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 827, Sec. 16.   Effective September 10, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

35789.

Any housemoving contractor or other person who by contract or otherwise moves or transports a dwelling house or other building across railroad tracks shall furnish to the division or district superintendent of the railroad company operating such tracks written notice of intention to make such movement at least 36 hours prior to doing so. The written notice of intention to make such a movement shall contain the name of the street, highway or road over which such dwelling house or other building will be moved across the railroad tracks, the approximate time of day such movement will be made and such other information as may be necessary to enable the railroad company to take
 precautionary measures to avoid a collision by a train with such dwelling house or other building.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 25789 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35789.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Current restrictions on the movement on the highways of manufactured homes in excess of 14 feet in width has caused the closure of some manufactured housing manufacturing facilities, that have, in turn, relocated to other states in order to compete with interstate commerce.

(2) Those restrictions on the movement of manufactured homes could cause
 the closure of at least three more manufacturing facilities within the next 12 months, thereby laying off some 500 employees, while at the same time those manufacturing facilities relocate to other states.

(3) The Department of Transportation has a policy allowing permitted loads in excess of 14 feet in width for the general trucking industry and the boating industry.

(4) The Legislature supports allowing the movement on the highways of manufactured homes in excess of 14 feet in width, with appropriate safeguards, because this policy will result in both of the following:

(A) Enable the manufactured housing industry to produce homes for export to other states, thereby keeping jobs within the state and benefiting the state’s economy.

(B) Permit the
 building of manufactured homes with eaves, which provide structural and aesthetic benefits to the homes.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that allowing the movement on the highways of manufactured homes that are 16 feet in width, with appropriate safeguards, will benefit the state’s economy and will allow production of more affordable and aesthetic manufactured homes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 278, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

35790.

(a) The Department of Transportation or local authorities with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions may, upon application in writing and if good cause appears, issue a special or annual permit in writing authorizing the applicant to move any manufactured home in excess of the maximum width but not exceeding 14 feet in total width, exclusive of lights and devices provided for in Sections 35109 and 35110, upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the party granting the permit.

(b) A public agency, in the exercise of its discretion in granting permits for the movement of overwidth manufactured homes, and in considering the individual circumstances of each case, may use merchandising or relocation of residence as a basis for movement for good cause.

(c) (1) The application for a special permit shall specifically describe the manufactured home to be moved and the particular highways over which the permit to operate is requested.

(2) The application for an annual permit shall specifically describe the power unit to be used to tow the overwidth manufactured homes and the particular highways over which the permit to operate is requested. The annual permit shall be subject to all of the conditions of this section and any additional conditions imposed by the public agency.

(d) The Department of Transportation or local authority may establish seasonal or other time limitations within which a manufactured home may be moved on the highways indicated, and may require an undertaking or other security as it deems necessary to protect the highways and bridges from injury or to provide indemnity for any injury resulting from the operation.

(e) Permits for the movement of manufactured homes under this section shall not be issued except to transporters or licensed manufacturers and dealers and only under the following conditions:

(1) The manufactured home for which the permit is issued shall comply with Sections 35550 and 35551.

(2) In the case of a permit issued on an individual or repetitive trip basis, the applicant has first
 received the approval of a city or county if the trip will include movement on streets or highways under the jurisdiction of the city or county. The application for such a permit shall indicate the complete route of the proposed move and shall specify all cities and counties that have approved the move. This paragraph shall not be construed to require the Department of Transportation to verify the information provided by an applicant with respect to movement on streets or highways under local jurisdiction.

(3) It is a violation of any permit, which is issued by the Department of Transportation and authorizes a move only on a state highway, for that move to be extended to a street or highway under the jurisdiction of a city or county unless the move has been approved by the city or county.

(f) The Department of Transportation, in cooperation with the Department of the California
 Highway Patrol, or the local authority may establish additional reasonable permit regulations as they may deem necessary in the interest of public safety, which regulations shall be consistent with this section.

(g) Every permit, the consent form or forms as required by Section 18099.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and a copy of the tax clearance certificate, certificate of origin, or dealer’s notice of transfer, when the certificate or notice is required to be issued, shall be carried in the manufactured home or power unit to which it refers and shall be open to inspection by any peace officer or traffic officer, any authorized agent of the Department of Transportation, or any other officer or employee charged with the care and protection of the highways.

(h) It is unlawful for any person to violate any of the terms or conditions of any permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

35790.1.

In addition to the requirements and conditions contained in Section 35790 and notwithstanding any other provision of law, all of the following conditions and specifications shall be complied with to move any manufactured home, as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code, that is in excess of 14 feet in total width, but not exceeding 16 feet in total width, exclusive of lights and devices provided for in Sections 35109 and 35110, upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the entity granting the permit:

(a) For the purposes of width requirements under this code, the overall width of manufactured housing specified in this section shall be the overall width, including roof overhang, eaves, window shades, porch roofs, or any other part of the manufactured house that cannot be removed for the purposes of transporting upon any highway.

(b) Unless otherwise exempted under this code, all combinations of motor vehicles and manufactured housing shall be equipped with service brakes on all wheels. Service brakes required under this subdivision shall be adequate, supplemental to the brakes on the towing vehicle, to enable the combination of vehicles to comply with the stopping distance requirements of Section 26454.

(c) In addition to the requirements contained in Section 26304, the breakaway brake device on any manufactured housing
 unit equipped with electric brakes shall be powered by a wet cell rechargeable battery that is of the same voltage rating as the brakes and has sufficient charge to hold the brakes applied for not less than 15 minutes.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the weight imposed upon any tire, wheel, axle, drawbar, hitch, or other suspension component on a manufactured housing unit shall not exceed the manufacturer’s maximum weight rating for the item or component.

(e) In addition to the requirements in subdivision (d), the maximum allowable weight upon one manufactured housing unit axle shall not exceed 6,000 pounds, and the maximum allowable weight upon one manufactured housing unit wheel shall not exceed 3,000 pounds.

(f) Manufactured housing unit tires shall be free from defects, have at
 least232 of an inch tread depth, as determined by tire tread wear indicators, and shall comply with specifications and requirements contained in Section 3280.904(b)(8) of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(g) Manufactured housing unit manufacturers shall provide transporters with a certification of compliance document, certifying the manufactured housing unit complies with the specifications and requirements contained in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f). Each certification of compliance document shall identify, by serial or identification number, the specific manufactured housing unit being transported and shall be signed by a representative of the manufacturer. Each transporter of manufactured housing units shall have in his or her immediate possession a copy of the certification of compliance document and shall make the document
 available upon request by any member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, any authorized employee of the Department of Transportation, or any regularly employed and salaried municipal police officer or deputy sheriff.

(h) Manufactured housing unit dealers shall provide transporters with a certification of compliance document, specifying that all modifications, equipment additions, or loading changes by the dealer have not exceeded the gross vehicle weight rating of the manufactured housing unit or the axle and wheel requirements contained in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f). Each certification of compliance document shall identify, by serial or identification number, the specific manufactured housing unit being transported and shall be signed by a representative of the dealer. Each transporter of manufactured housing units shall have in his or her immediate possession a copy of the certification of compliance document and shall
 make the document available upon request by any member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, any authorized employee of the Department of Transportation, any regularly employed and salaried municipal police officer or deputy sheriff, or any reserve police officer or reserve deputy sheriff listed under Section 830.6 of the Penal Code.

(i) Transporters of manufactured housing units shall not transport any additional load in, or upon, the manufactured housing unit that has not been certified by the manufactured housing unit’s manufacturer or dealer.

(j) Every hitch, coupling device, drawbar, or other connections between the towing unit and the towed manufactured housing unit shall be securely attached and shall comply with Subpart J of Part 3280 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(k) Manufactured housing units shall be equipped with an identification plate, specifying the manufacturer’s name, the manufactured housing unit’s serial number, the gross vehicle weight rating of the manufactured housing unit, and the gross weight of the cargo that may be transported in or upon the manufactured housing unit without exceeding the gross vehicle weight rating. The identification plate shall be permanently attached to the manufactured housing unit and shall be positioned adjacent to, and meet the same specifications and requirements applicable to, the certification label required by Subpart A of Part 3280 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(l) Manufactured housing units shall be subject to all lighting requirements contained in Sections 24603, 24607, 24608, and 24951. When transported during darkness, manufactured housing units shall additionally be subject to Sections 24600 and 25100.

(m) Manufactured housing units shall have all open sides covered by plywood, hard board, or other rigid material, or by other suitable plastics or flexible material. Plastic or flexible side coverings shall not billow or flap in excess of six inches in any one place. Units that are opened on both sides may be transported empty with no side coverings.

(n) Transporters of manufactured housing units shall make available all permits, licenses, certificates, forms, and any other relative document required for the transportation of manufactured housing upon request by any member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, any authorized employee of the Department of Transportation, any regularly employed and salaried municipal police officer or deputy sheriff, or any reserve police officer or reserve deputy sheriff listed under Section 830.6 of the Penal Code.

(o) The Department of Transportation, in cooperation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or the local authority, shall require pilot car or special escort services for the movement of any manufactured housing unit pursuant to this section, and may establish additional reasonable permit regulations, including special routing requirements, as necessary in the interest of public safety and consistent with this section.

(p) The Department of Transportation shall not issue a permit to move a manufactured home that is in excess of 14 feet in total width unless that department determines that all of the conditions and specifications set forth in this section have been met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 292, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

35790.4.

The Legislature finds and declares that current restrictions on the movement of combinations of manufactured homes have unduly restricted the ability of the California manufactured housing industry to meet the needs of the consumer in this state.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the improved movement of manufactured homes, with appropriate safeguards, will benefit the state’s economy and will allow production of more affordable and aesthetic manufactured homes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1312, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35790.5.

(a) A permit issued pursuant to Section 35790 may authorize an exemption from length limitations otherwise applicable to vehicles and combinations of vehicles for the transportation of more than one unit of a manufactured home if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The units are parts of a manufactured home that, when completed, connect two or more modular units.

(2) The units are mounted or loaded on a single vehicle or chassis in a manner so that their narrowest dimension represents the loaded
 width on the highway. 
